src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_83HEITMAE  !!= * @CODE@ heitmä:heit
!! gradation: yes
!! * Yaml: **heitmae**
:%{front%} V_83SÕITMA/HEITMAE ;

LEXICON V_83SÕITMA/HEITMAE  !!= * @CODE@ sõitma:sõi%{tt́d%}a
! (1) I tegonimi: 
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_PRSPRC_vA ;

! (2) II tegonimi: 
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL Harm_Neutr_INF_ZEROq ;

! (3) tekev tm aktiiv: 
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;

! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv: 
!:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL PSS_PRSPRC_tAv ;
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>%{eõ%} PSS_IND_PRS_SG1_dA ;
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>%{eõ%} PSS_IND_SG3_tX ;
!:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>%{eõ%} PSS_IND_SG1_dX/SG3_tX ;!2023_03_21

:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>%{eõ%} PSS_IND_PRT_SG1_di/SG3_ti ; !! IS THIS RIGHT? 2015-09-02
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>%{eõ%} PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_dU ;
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>%{eõ%} PSS_PRFPRC_tU_SG_NOM ;

! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq: 
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL ACT_IND_CONNEG/PRS_SG1 ; !! sõida
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;

:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_t/dEq/PL2_tiq ;

:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL ACT_IND_PRS_PL1_miq ;


! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä: 
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO/PL3_vAq ;

! (7) min 1. k maq: 
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO/PL3_q ;

+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_sE/PL3_sEq ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%>i ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_vAq ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_sEvAq ;
! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_t/dEq/PL1_miq/PL2_tiq ;
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_sEt/sEdEq/PL1_sEmiq/PL2_sEtiq ;

+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%>iq K ;

+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>s%{eõ%}q K ;



! (8) min 3. k tä: 
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^PAL%^VowRM ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_PEN-APOSTROPHE ;

+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>s%{eõ%} K ;

! (9) jus: 
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_JUS_kuq ;

LEXICON V_83TAHTMA  !!= * @CODE@ sõitma:sõit
!! gradation: yes
!! * Yaml: **switma**
:%{back%} V_83TAHTMA/XX ;

LEXICON V_83TAHTMA/XX  !!= * @CODE@ sõitma:sõi%{tt́d%}a tahtma+V:tah%{tt́Ø%}a
! (1) I tegonimi: 
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_PRSPRC_vA ;

! (2) II tegonimi: 
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL Harm_Neutr_INF_ZEROq ;

! (3) tekev tm aktiiv: 
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;

! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv: 
!:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL PSS_PRSPRC_tAv ;
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>e PSS_IND_SG1_dX/SG3_tX ;
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>e PSS_IND_PRT_SG1_di/SG3_ti ; !! IS THIS RIGHT? 2015-09-02
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>e PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_dU ;
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>e PSS_PRFPRC_tU_SG_NOM ;

! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq: 
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL ACT_IND_CONNEG/PRS_SG1 ; !! sõida
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;

:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_t/dEq/PL2_tiq ;

:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL ACT_IND_PRS_PL1_miq ;


! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä: 
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO/PL3_vAq ;

! (7) min 1. k maq: 
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO/PL3_q ;


+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%>i ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_vAq ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_sEvAq ;
! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_IND_PRT_sE ; ! 1-6

+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_t/dEq/PL1_miq/PL2_tiq ;

+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%>iq K ;

+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>s%{eõ%}q K ;



! (8) min 3. k tä: 
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_PEN-APOSTROPHE ;

+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>s%{eõ%} K ;

! (9) jus: 
:%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_JUS_kuq ;


LEXICON V_83LAULMA  !!= * @CODE@ laulma:laul
!! gradation: yes
!! * Yaml: **switma**
:%{back%} V_83LAULMA/XX ;


LEXICON V_83LAULMA/XX  !!= * @CODE@ laulma:lau%{lĺ%}
! (1) I tegonimi: 
:%^NoPAL Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;

:%^NoPAL Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_v ;

! (2) II tegonimi: 
:%^NoPAL Harm_Neutr_INF_dAq ;  !! HERE is the distinction 2016-10-04

! (3) tekev tm aktiiv: 
:%^NoPAL ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;

! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv: 
:%^VowRM PSS_PRSPRC_tAv ;
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^PSS PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_dU ;
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^PSS Harm_Neutr_NÕSTMA-PSS-DISTRIBUTION ;
:%^PSS PSS_IND_SG1_dX/SG3_tX ; !! IS THIS RIGHT? 2015-09-02

! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq: 
:%^NoPAL%{aä%} ACT_IND_CONNEG/PRS_SG1 ;
:%^NoPAL%{aä%} ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;

! 2nd person indicative present
:%^NoPAL%{aä%} ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_t/dEq/PL2_tiq ;
! 1st person plural present
:%^NoPAL%{aä%}  ACT_IND_PRS_PL1_miq ;

+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^VowRM K ; 
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VowRM%>v%{aä%}q K ; 

! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä: 
:%^NoPAL  ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_q/vAq ;

! (7) min 1. k maq: 
:%^NoPAL%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO/PL3_q ;
:%^NoPAL ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_sE/PL3_sEq ;

! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
:%^NoPAL%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_t/dEq/PL1_miq/PL2_tiq ;
+Err/Dial:%^NoPAL  ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_sEt/sEdEq/PL1_sEmiq/PL2_sEtiq ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^NoPAL%>iq K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^NoPAL%>s%{eõ%}q K ;

+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^NoPAL%>iv%{aä%}q K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^NoPALM%>s%{eõ%}v%{aä%}q K ;

! (8) min 3. k tä: 
:%^PAL ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_ZERO ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_ZERO ;
+Err/Dial:%^NoPAL ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_sE ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^VowRM%>s%{eõ%} K ;

! (9) jus: 
:%^NoPAL ACT_JUS_guq ;

LEXICON V_83ATMA  !!= * @CODE@ atma:atta
!! gradation: yes
!! * Yaml: **switma**
:%{back%} V_83ATMA/XX ;
!LEXICON V_83PETMÄ  !!= * @CODE@ petmä:pettä
!!! gradation: yes
!!! * Yaml: __heitmae__
!:%{front%} V_83ATMA/PETMÄ ;

LEXICON V_83ATMA/XX  !!= * @CODE@ atma:a%{tØ%}%{tt́%}
!atma+V:a%{tØ%}%{tt́%}
! (1) I tegonimi:
:%^CC2C%^NoPAL Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;

! (2) II tegonimi: 
:%^StrGStem%^NoPAL%{aä%} Harm_Neutr_INF_ZEROq ;
:%^CC2C%^NoPAL ACT_PRSPRC_vA ;

! (3) tekev tm aktiiv: 
:%^CC2C%^NoPAL ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;

! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv: 

:%^WGStem%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>%{eõ%} PSS_IND_SG1_tX/SG3_tX ;

:%^WGStem%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>e PSS_IND_SG1_dX/SG3_tX ; !! IS THIS RIGHT? 2015-09-02


! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq:
:%^WGStem%^NoPAL%{aä%} ACT_IND_CONNEG/PRS_SG1 ;
:%^WGStem%^NoPAL%{aä%} ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;

! 2nd person indicative present
:%^WGStem%^NoPAL%{aä%} ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_t/dEq/PL2_tiq ;

! 1st person plural present
:%^WGStem%^NoPAL%{aä%} ACT_IND_PRS_PL1_miq ;

%^StrGStem%^NoPAL ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO ;
:%^CC2C%^NoPAL ACT_IND_PRS_PL3_vAq ;

! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3
:%^WGStem%^NoPAL%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO/PL3_q ; !ati 
+Err/Dial:%^CC2C%^NoPAL ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_sE/PL3_sEq ; 

! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
:%^WGStem%^NoPAL%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_t/dEq/PL1_miq/PL2_tiq ;
:%^CC2C%^NoPAL ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_sEt/sEdEq/PL1_sEmiq/PL2_sEtiq ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>iq K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^CC2C%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>s%{eõ%}q K ;

! (8) min 3. k tä:
:%^StrGStem%^PAL ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_ZERO ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^StrGStem%^NoPAL ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_ZERO ;


+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^CC2C%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>s%{eõ%} K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^WGStem%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>imiq K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^CC2C%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>s%{eõ%}miq K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^WGStem%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>itiq K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^CC2C%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>s%{eõ%}tiq K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^WGStem%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>iq K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^WGStem%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>iv%{aä%}q K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^CC2C%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>s%{eõ%}q K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^CC2C%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>s%{eõ%}v%{aä%}q K ;


! (9) jus:
:%^CC2C%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_JUS_kuq ;

LEXICON V_83SUTMA  !!= * @CODE@ atma:a%{tØ%}%{tt́%}a
!! gradation: yes
!! * Yaml: **switma**
:%{back%} V_83SUTMA/PETMÄ ;
LEXICON V_83PETMÄ  !!= * @CODE@ petmä:pe%{tØ%}%{tt́%}ä
!! gradation: G3, G4
!! * Yaml: **heitmae**
:%{front%} V_83SUTMA/PETMÄ ;

LEXICON V_83SUTMA/PETMÄ  !!= * @CODE@ sutma:su%{tØ%}%{tt́%}a
! (1) I tegonimi: 
:%^Pen%^CC2C%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;

! (2) II tegonimi: 
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL Harm_Neutr_INF_ZEROq ;
:%^Pen%^CC2C%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_PRSPRC_vA ;

! (3) tekev tm aktiiv: 
:%^Pen%^CC2C%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;

! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv: 
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL Harm_Neutr_NÕSTMA-PSS-DISTRIBUTION ;
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL PSS_IND_SG1_dX/SG3_tX ; !! IS THIS RIGHT? 2015-09-02

:%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_dU ;

! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq: (1. and Neg, ConNegs.)
! Different from 2.
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL ACT_IND_CONNEG/PRS_SG1 ; !! sõida
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;

+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL ACT_IND_CONNEG ;
! 2nd person indicative present
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_t/dEq/PL2_tiq ;

! 1st person plural present
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL ACT_IND_PRS_PL1_miq ; 

! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä: 
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO/PL3_vAq ;

! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO/PL3_q ; 
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^CC2C%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_sE/PL3_sEq ; 

! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_t/dEq/PL1_miq/PL2_tiq ;
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^CC2C%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_sEt/sEdEq/PL1_sEmiq/PL2_sEtiq ;

+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_q ;
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^CC2C%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_sEq ;

+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^Pen%^WGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>i ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_vAq ;
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^CC2C%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_sEvAq ;

! (8) min 3. k tä: 
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^PAL%^VowRM ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_ZERO ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_ZERO ;
+Err/Dial:%^Pen%^CC2C%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_sE ;

! (9) jus: 
:%^Pen%^CC2C%^Pen%^NoPAL%^VowRM ACT_JUS_kuq ;

!!!
LEXICON V_83VWTMA  !!= * @CODE@ võtma:võ%{tØ%}%{tt́Ø%}a
!! gradation: G3, G4, G1
!! * Yaml: **vwtma**
:%{back%} V_83VWTMA/XX ;
